Utah statutes.
54-8-13.   Assessment list to be prepared.

After a decision is taken by a governing body to proceed with the district and project, it shall cause to be prepared an assessment list detailing the total amount to be assessed, the specific properties assessed, and the amount of assessment on each piece of property.

